Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(1) "Actuarial value" means the present value of a change in actuarial liability;

(2) "Department" means the department of retirement systems; and

(3) "Director" means the director of the department of retirement systems.

[ 1994 c 197 s 30; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.